Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-1462
Grants for law enforcement agencies; eligibility; application.

(1) The council shall accept applications for grants from law enforcement agencies in Nebraska. The grants shall be used to provide hiring bonuses to newly hired full-time law enforcement officers.

(2) A law enforcement agency shall be eligible for a grant under this section if:

(a) The law enforcement agency employs fewer than one hundred fifty full-time law enforcement officers; and

(b) The law enforcement agency is not at the recommended level of staffing under standards set by the council.

Laws 2022, LB1241, § 9.
July 1, 2022June 30, 2028